pt-BR: Padrão de interface de montagem: Soquete esférico de 20 mm; Soquete esférico de 25 mm (1"); Soquete esférico de 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS de 4 furos; Personalizada; Aba T dupla; Magnética; Placa diamante RAM; Aba T simples; Entalhe em T; Outro
vi: Mẫu giao diện lắp đặt: Ổ cắm bi 20 mm; Ổ cắm bi 25 mm (1"); Ổ cắm bi 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS 4 lỗ; Tùy chỉnh; Khớp chữ T kép; Từ tính; Tấm kim cương RAM; Khớp chữ T đơn; Rãnh chữ T; Khác
ko: 마운팅 인터페이스 패턴: 20mm 볼 소켓; 25mm (1인치) 볼 소켓; 38mm (1.5인치) 볼 소켓; 4홀 AMPS; 커스텀; 듀얼 T-탭; 자기식; RAM 다이아몬드 플레이트; 싱글 T-탭; T-노치; 기타
zh-CN: 安装接口模式: 20 毫米球形接口; 25 毫米（1 英寸）球形接口; 38 毫米（1.5 英寸）球形接口; 4 孔 AMPS; 定制; 双 T 形卡扣; 磁力; RAM 菱形板; 单 T 形卡扣; T 形凹槽; 其他
el: Πρότυπο διεπαφής στήριξης: Υποδοχή σφαίρας 20 mm; Υποδοχή σφαίρας 25 mm (1"); Υποδοχή σφαίρας 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS 4 οπών; Custom; Διπλή γλωττίδα T; Μαγνητικό; Πλάκα RAM diamond; Μονή γλωττίδα T; Εγκοπή T; Άλλο
fi: Kiinnityskäyttöliittymän malli: 20 mm kuulapesä; 25 mm (1") kuulapesä; 38 mm (1,5") kuulapesä; 4-reikäinen AMPS; Mukautettu; Kaksois-T-kiinnike; Magneettinen; RAM-timanttilevy; Yksittäinen T-kiinnike; T-lovi; Muu
pl: Wzór interfejsu montażowego: Gniazdo kulowe 20 mm; Gniazdo kulowe 25 mm (1"); Gniazdo kulowe 38 mm (1,5"); 4-otworowy AMPS; Niestandardowe terminy; Podwójny zaczep typu T; Magnetyczny; Płytka diamentowa RAM; Pojedynczy zaczep typu T; Wcięcie typu T; Inne
sk-SK: Vzor montážneho rozhrania: 20 mm guľový kĺb; 25 mm (1") guľový kĺb; 38 mm (1,5") guľový kĺb; 4-otvorový AMPS; Prispôsobený; Dvojitý T-jazýček; Magnetický; RAM diamantová platňa; Jednoduchý T-jazýček; T-zárez; Iné
sv: Monteringsgränssnittsmönster: 20 mm kulled; 25 mm (1") kulled; 38 mm (1,5") kulled; 4-håls AMPS; Anpassad; Dubbel T-flik; Magnetisk; RAM diamantplatta; Enkel T-flik; T-skåra; Övrigt
en: Mounting interface pattern: 20 mm ball socket; 25 mm (1") ball socket; 38 mm (1.5") ball socket; 4-hole AMPS; Custom; Dual T-tab; Magnetic; RAM diamond plate; Single T-tab; T-notch; Other
de: Montageschnittstellenstandard: 20 mm Kugelpfanne; 25 mm (1") Kugelpfanne; 38 mm (1,5") Kugelpfanne; 4-Loch AMPS; Maßgeschneidert; Doppel-T-Lasche; Magnetisch; RAM Diamantplatte; Einzel-T-Lasche; T-Kerbe; Sonstiges
ru: Схема монтажного интерфейса: Шаровое гнездо 20 мм; Шаровое гнездо 25 мм (1"); Шаровое гнездо 38 мм (1.5"); 4-отверстный AMPS; Индивидуальный; Двойной T-выступ; Магнитный; Алмазная пластина RAM; Одинарный T-выступ; T-паз; Другой
tr: Montaj arayüzü deseni: 20 mm bilyeli soket; 25 mm (1") bilyeli soket; 38 mm (1,5") bilyeli soket; 4 delikli AMPS; Özel; Çift T-tırnak; Manyetik; RAM elmas plaka; Tekli T-tırnak; T-çentik; Diğer
cs: Vzor montážního rozhraní: 20 mm kulový kloub; 25 mm (1") kulový kloub; 38 mm (1,5") kulový kloub; 4otvorový AMPS; Vlastní; Dvojitý T-úchyt; Magnetická; RAM diamantová deska; Jednoduchý T-úchyt; T-drážka; Jiné
fr: Modèle d’interface du support: Rotule de 20 mm; Rotule de 25 mm (1"); Rotule de 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS 4 trous; Personnalisé; Double languette en T; Magnétique; Plaque diamant RAM; Languette en T simple; Encoche en T; Autre
hr-HR: Uzorak sučelja za montiranje: Kuglasti ležaj 20 mm; Kuglasti ležaj 25 mm (1"); Kuglasti ležaj 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS s 4 rupe; Prilagođeni; Dvostruka T-ušica; Magnet; RAM dijamantna ploča; Jednostruka T-ušica; T-utor; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vzorec montažnega vmesnika: 20 mm kroglično ležišče; 25 mm (1") kroglično ležišče; 38 mm (1,5") kroglično ležišče; 4-luknjasti AMPS; Po meri; Dvojni T-jeziček; Magnetno; RAM diamantna plošča; Enojni T-jeziček; T-zareza; Drugo
es: Patrón de interfaz de montaje: Rótula de 20 mm; Rótula de 25 mm (1"); Rótula de 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS de 4 agujeros; Personalizado; Pestaña en T doble; Magnético; Placa diamante RAM; Pestaña en T simple; Muesca en T; Otros
lt-LT: Montavimo sąsajos šablonas: 20 mm rutulio lizdas; 25 mm (1") rutulio lizdas; 38 mm (1,5") rutulio lizdas; 4 skylių AMPS; Pasirinktinis; Dvigubas T formos laikiklis; Magnetinis; RAM deimantinė plokštė; Viengubas T formos laikiklis; T formos išpjova; Kita
ja: マウントインターフェースパターン: 20 mm ボールソケット; 25 mm (1") ボールソケット; 38 mm (1.5") ボールソケット; 4穴 AMPS; カスタム; デュアル T タブ; 磁気; RAM ダイヤモンドプレート; シングル T タブ; T ノッチ; その他
it: Schema dell'interfaccia di montaggio: Presa a sfera da 20 mm; Presa a sfera da 25 mm (1"); Presa a sfera da 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS a 4 fori; Personalizzato; Doppia linguetta a T; Magnetico; Piastra diamantata RAM; Singola linguetta a T; Intaglio a T; Altro
bg-BG: Модел на интерфейса за монтаж: 20 мм сферичен накрайник; 25 мм (1") сферичен накрайник; 38 мм (1,5") сферичен накрайник; 4-дупков AMPS; Персонализиран; Двоен T-образен накрайник; Магнитна; RAM диамантена плоча; Единичен T-образен накрайник; T-образен жлеб; Други
pt-PT: Padrão de interface mecânica: Encaixe esférico de 20 mm; Encaixe esférico de 25 mm (1"); Encaixe esférico de 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS de 4 furos; À medida; Aba T dupla; Magnético; Placa diamante RAM; Aba T simples; Entalhe em T; Outro
hu: Rögzítési interfész mintája: 20 mm-es gömbcsukló; 25 mm-es (1") gömbcsukló; 38 mm-es (1,5") gömbcsukló; 4 lyukú AMPS; Egyedi; Dupla T-fül; Mágneses; RAM gyémánt lemez; Egyszeres T-fül; T-bevágás; Egyéb
zh-TW: 安裝介面樣式: 20 毫米球座; 25 毫米（1 英寸）球座; 38 毫米（1.5 英寸）球座; 4 孔 AMPS; 客製化; 雙 T 型卡榫; 磁性; RAM 菱形板; 單 T 型卡榫; T 型凹槽; 其他
th: รูปแบบอินเทอร์เฟซการติดตั้ง: ช่องบอล 20 มม.; ช่องบอล 25 มม. (1"); ช่องบอล 38 มม. (1.5"); AMPS 4 รู; ปรับเข้ารูป; แท็บ T คู่; แม่เหล็ก; แผ่นเพชร RAM; แท็บ T เดี่ยว; ร่อง T; อื่นๆ
da: Monteringsgrænseflademønster: 20 mm kuglefatning; 25 mm (1") kuglefatning; 38 mm (1,5") kuglefatning; 4-huls AMPS; Skræddersyet; Dobbelt T-tap; Magnetisk; RAM diamantplade; Enkelt T-tap; T-hak; Andet
nb: Monteringsgrensesnitt mønster: 20 mm kulekobling; 25 mm (1") kulekobling; 38 mm (1,5") kulekobling; 4-hulls AMPS; Tilpasset; Dobbel T-tapp; Magnetisk; RAM diamantplate; Enkel T-tapp; T-hakk; Annet
ro-RO: Model interfață de montare: Soclu cu bilă de 20 mm; Soclu cu bilă de 25 mm (1"); Soclu cu bilă de 38 mm (1,5"); AMPS cu 4 orificii; Personalizat; Lamelă T dublă; Magnetic; Placă diamant RAM; Lamelă T simplă; Crestătură în T; Altele
nl: Montage-interface patroon: 20 mm kogelgewricht; 25 mm (1") kogelgewricht; 38 mm (1,5") kogelgewricht; 4-gats AMPS; Aangepast; Dubbele T-tab; Magnetisch; RAM diamantplaat; Enkele T-tab; T-inkeping; Andere